Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0245

"Gambling information."

"Gambling information," as used in this chapter, means any wager made in the course of and any information intended to be used for professional gambling. In the application of this definition, information as to wagers, betting odds and changes in betting odds shall be presumed to be intended for use in professional gambling. This section shall not apply to newspapers of general circulation or commercial radio and television stations licensed by the federal communications commission.

[ 1987 c 4 s 12. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(11).]